Maryland, session 2026, HB1265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
5–304.
(d) The certificate of candidacy shall be accompanied by:
(1) a filing fee satisfying the requirements of § 5–401 of this title;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1265*

HOUSE BILL 1265
(2) a separate form, unless such a form has previously been filed,
establishing a campaign finance entity under Title 13 of this article;
(3) evidence that the individual has filed:
(i) a financial disclosure statement with the State Ethics
Commission in accordance with the requirements of Title 5, Subtitle 6 of the General
Provisions Article; or
(ii) any other financial disclosure report required by law; [and]
(4) THE SIGNED OATH OR STATEMENT REQUIRED UNDER § 5–306 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
[(4)] (5) any additional information required by the State Board.
5–306.
A CANDIDATE SHALL SUBMIT WITH THE CANDIDATE’S CERTIFICATE OF
CANDIDACY:
(1) THE FOLLOWING OATH, SIGNED BY THE CANDIDATE:
“1. I, __________, DO SOLEMNLY SWEAR OR AFFIRM, AS A CONDITION OF FILING
TO BE A CANDIDATE FOR AN ELECTED OFFICE IN MARYLAND, THAT ALL MATERIAL,
ORAL OR WRITTEN, I PROVIDE TO THE PUBLIC WILL BE FACTUALLY TRUTHFUL TO
THE BEST OF MY KNOWLEDGE AND BELIEF;
2. THAT I MAY BE SUBJECT TO CHARGES OF PERJURY, DISQUALIFICATION OF MY
CANDIDACY, OR REMOVAL FROM OFFICE IF I KNOWINGLY DISSEMINATE
DELIBERATELY FALSE INFORMATION, INCLUDING INFORMATION REGARDING:
(1) PAST OR PRESENT EMPLOYMENT;
(2) CRIMINAL OR CIVIL LEGAL HISTORY; AND
(3) FORMAL MEMBERSHIP OR AFFILIATION WITH A NONPROFIT OR
FOR–PROFIT ORGANIZATION OR A RELIGIOUS INSTITUTION.
3. THAT, AS A CANDIDATE FOR PUBLIC OFFICE, I WILL PROMISE TO FAITHFULLY
AND IMPARTIALLY PERFORM ALL DUTIES INCUMBENT ON ME IN THE OFFICE I AM
SEEKING, UNDER THE CONSTITUTION AND LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES AND THIS
STATE.

HOUSE BILL 1265 3
4. THIS OATH DOES NOT PROHIBIT A CANDIDATE FROM, IN THE NORMAL COURSE
OF CAMPAIGNING, EMBELLISHING OR EDITORIALIZING NONFACTUAL OPINIONS OR
INFORMATION, INCLUDING PERSONAL INFORMATION.
5. THE INFORMATION INCLUDED IN OR ACCOMPANYING MY CERTIFICATE OF
CANDIDACY, INCLUDING THIS DOCUMENT, IS AVAILABLE FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION.
_______________________ __________
(SIGNATURE) (DATE)”; OR
(2) IF THE CANDIDATE DECLINES TO SIGN THE OATH DESCRIBED
UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING OATH, SIGNED BY THE
CANDIDATE:
“1. I, __________, CHOOSE NOT TO SWEAR OR AFFIRM THAT I WILL BE TRUTHFUL
IN MY FACTUAL DISCLOSURES TO THE PUBLIC IN THE COURSE OF MY CANDIDACY
FOR THE OFFICE I AM SEEKING.
2. THE INFORMATION INCLUDED IN OR ACCOMPANYING MY CERTIFICATE OF
CANDIDACY, INCLUDING THIS DOCUMENT, IS AVAILABLE FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION.
_______________________ __________
(SIGNATURE) (DATE)”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or any other
application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.